Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Prison Labor

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

60 Am. Jur. 2d Penal Institutions §§ 162 to 173, 203 to 206.

72 C.J.S. Prisons § 144 et seq.

§ 7-16-201.
Contracting to private persons.

Except as authorized by W.S.

25-13-101

through

25-13-107

, no person in charge of prisoners at any state penal institution shall contract to supply prisoner labor to any private person or private business entity.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 51, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3373; R.S. 1899, § 5538; C.S. 1910, § 6400; C.S. 1920, § 7696; Laws 1931, ch. 90, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 33-1705; C.S. 1945, § 10-2905; W.S. 1957, § 7-367; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-705; Laws 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1999, ch. 141, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to state institutions, see §

25-1-201

.

§ 7-16-202.
Persons subject to required work.

All prisoners sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections to serve a term of imprisonment in a state penal institution may be employed within the institution or in any work for the benefit of and use by the state or any of its agencies or political subdivisions.

An inmate of a state penal institution shall be required to perform available hard labor which is suited to the inmate’s age, gender, physical and mental condition, strength and attainments in the institution proper, in the industries established in connection with the institution, or at other places as provided in subsection (a) of this section. Substantially equivalent hard labor programs shall be available to both male and female inmates. Inmates performing hard labor at a location other than within or on the grounds of a state penal institution shall be attired in brightly colored uniforms that readily identify them as inmates of state penal institutions. The employment of inmates in hard labor shall not displace employed workers, shall not be applied to skills, crafts or trades in which a local surplus of labor exists, and shall not impair existing contracts for employment or services.

For purposes of this section, “hard labor” means physical or mental labor which is performed for a period of time which shall average, as nearly as possible, forty (40) hours each week, and may include useful and productive work. “Hard labor” may include menial labor, any training necessary to perform any work required, and if possible, work providing an inmate with marketable vocational skills. “Hard labor” does not include labor which is dangerous to an inmate’s life or health, is unduly painful or is required to be performed under conditions that would violate occupational safety and health standards applicable to such labor if performed by a person who is not an inmate.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, an inmate who has been determined by the institution administrator to be unsuitable for the performance of hard labor due to the inmate’s age, gender, physical or mental condition, strength or security status shall not be required to perform hard labor.

The department of corrections shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 61, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 589; R.S. 1931, § 108-812; C.S. 1945, § 19-1006; W.S. 1957, § 7-370; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-708; Laws 1987, ch. 46, § 1; ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1997, ch. 202, § 1.

No protected property interest. —

Wyoming statutes indicate broad discretion over whether an inmate can work and, if so, whether he or she can receive any compensation; inmate therefore has no legally cognizable property interest in his prison work assignment or rate of pay. Garnett v. Hettgar, 2 P.3d 558,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 7-16-203.
Compensation.

Persons in confinement in state corrections institutions may receive compensation as specified by the department of corrections for services performed under W.S.

7-16-202

. In no case shall the total of all compensation credited exceed the general fund appropriation for that institution. The compensation rate to be paid to any prisoner shall not exceed the state minimum wage.

The compensation limitations in subsection (a) of this section do not apply to correctional industries programs authorized under W.S.

25-13-101

through

25-13-107

.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 61, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 595; R.S. 1931, § 108-818; C.S. 1945, § 19-1011; W.S. 1957, § 7-376; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-714; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1999, ch. 141, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to good time allowances, see §

7-13-420

.

As to credits for county jail prisoners, see §

7-16-102

.

As to working prisoners convicted for violation of municipal ordinances, see §

5-6-211

.

As to commitment for nonpayment of fine, and as to rate per day, see §

6-10-105

.

As to minimum wage, see §

27-4-202

.

No protected property interest. —

Wyoming statutes indicate broad discretion over whether an inmate can work and, if so, whether he or she can receive any compensation; inmate therefore has no legally cognizable property interest in his prison work assignment or rate of pay. Garnett v. Hettgar, 2 P.3d 558,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Freezing inmate's prison account unconstitutional. —

Freezing an inmate's prison account, while charging him for transportation from another prison, gave rise to a federal civil rights claim for relief based on a deprivation of his property without due process, but did not support a claim of cruel and unusual punishment. Gillihan v. Shillinger, 872 F.2d 935, 1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 4823 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Clark v. Wilson, 625 F.3d 686, 2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 23939 (10th Cir. Okla. 2010).

Child support. —

Since child support obligations are specifically designated in §

7-16-205

, it is clear that the legislature intended they be paid where reasonably possible, and where prisoner made no credible showing that payment of his minimal child support would deprive him of necessities during his prison incarceration, the court did not abuse its discretion in ordering the prisoner to pay child support. Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

If an incarcerated parent does have assets or income while in prison, that income can properly be applied against that parent's outstanding support obligation. Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 7-16-204.
Fines for misconduct.

The department of corrections shall adopt rules and regulations to establish a system for punishing prisoner misconduct through the imposition of fines to be deducted from compensation earned as provided by W.S.

7-16-203

. The rules shall provide for the distribution of the proceeds of fines collected under this section as special aid to discharged or paroled prisoners who are infirm or in any way incapable of earning a sufficient subsistence after their release.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 61, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 596; R.S. 1931, § 108-819; C.S. 1945, § 19-1012; W.S. 1957, § 7-377; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-715; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Applied

in

Gillihan v. Shillinger, 872 F.2d 935, 1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 4823 (10th Cir. 1989).

§ 7-16-205.
Disposition of earnings; confidentiality of amount.

Payment for services performed by any prisoner under W.S.

7-16-202

shall be deposited in the trust and agency account at the institution and shall be disbursed for the purposes provided in this subsection and in the order specified:

Unless the prisoner is serving a sentence of death or life without the possibility of parole or is subject to mandatory savings under W.S. 25-13-107(b)(i), ten percent (10%) shall be credited to the prisoner’s personal savings account within the correctional facility’s trust and agency account, until the prisoner’s account has a balance of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Once the prisoner’s personal savings account balance reaches one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), the income otherwise distributed to the prisoner’s savings account under this paragraph shall be distributed to the prisoner as provided by paragraphs (ii) through (vi) of this subsection. Funds in the prisoner’s personal savings account shall be paid to the prisoner upon parole or final discharge;

Support of dependent relations of the prisoner;

Personal necessities and assessments of fees for programs, services and assistance pursuant to subsection (e) of this section;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 62, § 2.

Court ordered restitution, fines, sanctions and reimbursement for the services of public defender or court appointed counsel, the surcharge imposed under W.S.

1-40-119

, victims compensation obligations under W.S. 1-40-112(g) and the surcharge imposed under W.S.

7-13-1616

;

Remaining funds shall be paid the prisoner upon parole or final discharge.

The amount in the trust and agency fund assigned to the credit of any prisoner is confidential information and is not subject to public inspection.

Except as otherwise provided for correctional industries programs authorized by W.S.

25-13-101

through

25-13-107

, any compensation earned by a prisoner while incarcerated shall be subject to the provisions of this section.

The department of corrections shall establish regulations governing provisions for travel, clothing and cash needed by each prisoner upon release from any state penal institution.

The department of corrections may establish regulations providing for assessment of fees to prisoners for self-improvement programs, services, including medical services, and assistance provided by the department when the inmate has money to pay for the programs, services and assistance.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 61, § 9; 1919, ch. 62, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 597; Laws 1923, ch. 46, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-820; C.S. 1945, § 19-1013; W.S. 1957, § 7-378; Laws 1959, ch. 72, § 1; 1967, ch. 11, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-716; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1999, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; ch. 141, § 2; 2010, ch. 43, § 1; 2016 ch. 71, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to victim restitution, see chapter 9 of this title.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(i), and redesignated former (a)(i), (a)(iii) and (a)(v) as (a)(iii), (a)(v) and (a)(vi).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and” following “W.S.

1-40-119

” and inserted “and the surcharge imposed under
W.S.

7-13-1616

” in (a)(v).

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1911, ch. 61, § 14, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Life sentence. —

District court
correctly applied the law and did not abuse its discretion in denying
an inmate's motion for relief because it properly disposed of the
inmate's civil rights suit; the district court concluded that the
inmate's life sentence did not fall within the exemption for inmates
under a death sentence or a sentence of “life without the possibility
of parole” because it was not designated as a sentence of life
without parole, which was the type of life sentence addressed in the
exemption Nicodemus v. Lampert, 2014 WY 135, 336 P.3d 671,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2014).

Restitution withdrawn from prison earnings. —

District court did not by ordering restitution that the Department of Corrections could withdraw from defendant's prison earnings because unless the district court found that defendant was unable to pay restitution, it was required to set the total amount she had to repay the victim, and its order to that effect constituted a judgment upon which the victim could execute. McEwan v. State, 2013 WY 158, 314 P.3d 1160,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2013).

Freezing inmate's prison account unconstitutional. —

Freezing an inmate's prison account, while charging him for transportation from another prison, gave rise to a federal civil rights claim for relief based on a deprivation of his property without due process, but did not support a claim of cruel and unusual punishment. Gillihan v. Shillinger, 872 F.2d 935, 1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 4823 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Clark v. Wilson, 625 F.3d 686, 2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 23939 (10th Cir. Okla. 2010).

Child support. —

Since child support obligations are specifically designated in §

7-16-205

, it is clear that the legislature intended they be paid where reasonably possible, and where prisoner made no credible showing that payment of his minimal child support would deprive him of necessities during his prison incarceration, the court did not abuse its discretion in ordering the prisoner to pay child support. Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

If an incarcerated parent does have assets or income while in prison, that income can properly be applied against that parent's outstanding support obligation. Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of income due to incarceration as affecting child support obligation, 27 ALR5th 540.

§ 7-16-206.
Permitted institutional industries; powers of department.

The department of corrections, for purposes of assisting in the rehabilitation of residents of state penal institutions, may:

Establish industries in state penal institutions that will result in the manufacture of products or the provision of services that may be used by any agency or political subdivision of this state, any agency of the federal government or any agency or political subdivision of another state;

Contract with private industry for the sale of products manufactured in state penal institutions and for the provision of services pursuant to W.S.

25-13-104

;

Print and distribute catalogs describing goods manufactured in state penal institutions;

Fix the sale price for products manufactured or services produced at state penal institutions and purchased by the state of Wyoming or any of its political subdivisions, not to exceed open market prices for comparable goods and services;

Provide for the repair and maintenance of property and equipment of state penal institutions by residents of those institutions;

Provide for the repair and maintenance of any state agency’s furniture and equipment by residents of state penal institutions;

Sell on the open market products manufactured at state penal institutions; and

Pay a resident of a penal institution from the proceeds of products manufactured or services provided in a program in which the resident is working pursuant to this subsection.

Payment for the performance of work authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be based in part on the following criteria:

Knowledge or skill;

Attitude toward authority;

Physical effort;

Responsibility for equipment and materials; and

Regard for safety of others.

A manufactured product shall not be sold under paragraph (a)(ii) or (vii) of this section if the same or comparable product is manufactured elsewhere in this state.

The maximum rate of pay for work performed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be determined by the appropriation established for each program in accordance with W.S.

7-16-202

through

7-16-205

.

Proceeds from the sale of products manufactured or services provided at a state penal institution pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited in the correctional industries account in accordance with W.S. 25-13-103(a).

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 76, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (e), substituted “account” for “enterprise or internal service fund.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “and for the provision of services pursuant to W.S.

25-13-104

” in (a)(ii); and substituted “correctional industries in account in accordance with W.S. 25-13-103(a)” for “appropriate account for the use of the industries program of the same institution” in (e).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 76, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.